Hawaii statutes.
§466-4 Board of public accountancy.
(a) There shall be a board of public accountancy to be known as the state
board of public accountancy, which shall consist of nine members. All members
of the board shall be citizens of the United States and residents of this
State. Seven members thereof shall hold current licenses issued under this
chapter, of which six of the seven members shall hold current permits to
practice public accountancy and be in active practice; and two shall be public
members.

(b) The governor shall remove or suspend any
member of the board for cause, in accordance with section 26-34, including any
member thereof:

(1) Who ceases to engage in active practice as a
certified public accountant or as a public accountant, as the case may be; or

(2) Whose license of certified public accountant or
of public accountant, as the case may be, or whose permit to practice public
accountancy:

(A) Has been canceled, revoked, or suspended;

(B) Has expired without renewal; or

(C) Has otherwise become invalid.

(c) The director shall employ clerks,
proctors, examiners, and other personnel under chapter 76 to assist the board
in the performance of its duties.

(d) In addition to any other powers and duties
authorized by law, the board, in accordance with chapter 91 shall:

(1) Initiate investigations and hearings, either upon
complaint or on its own motion on any matter involving the conduct of certified
public accountants, public accountants, or firms, or the violation of any of
the provisions of this chapter or the rules of the board;

(2) Adopt, amend, and repeal rules governing the
administration and enforcement of this chapter and the conduct of the
licensees, as it deems appropriate to establish and maintain high standards of
competence and integrity in the practice of public accountancy;

(3) Grant, deny, suspend, or revoke licenses that are
authorized by this chapter and impose such conditions as may be necessary in
connection with the granting, denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses;

(4) Prescribe the proof to be furnished for the
issuance of a duplicate license in place of one alleged to have been lost or
destroyed, including a requirement for any indemnity deemed appropriate to the
case; and

(5) Grant, renew, forfeit and restore permits to
practice that are authorized by this chapter and impose such conditions as may
be necessary in connection with the granting, renewal, forfeiture and
restoration of permits. [L 1973, c 158, pt of §2; am L 1978, c 208, §13; am L
1983, c 6, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1989, c 110, §5; am L 1992, c 202, §163 and c
204, §1; am L 1993, c 51, §1; am L 1997, c 86, §1; am L 2000, c 253, §150]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next